North Carolina statutes. Chapter 15. Criminal Procedure.
Article 9. Preliminary Examination. [Repealed]

§§ 15-85 through 15-101.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1286, s. 26.

Cross References.

See Editor’s note following the analysis to this Chapter. For present provisions as to first appearance before a district court judge, see

G.S. 15A-601

et seq. As to probable-cause hearing, see

G.S. 15A-611

et seq.